Idaho, session 2025, S1092.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1204, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1204. VALIDITY, DURATION, RENEWAL, AND LAPSE OF CERTIFICATES --
LIFETIME INSTRUCTIONAL AND LIFETIME ADMINISTRATOR CERTIFICATES. (1) The
state board of education shall by rule provide for the validity, duration,
renewal, and lapse of certificates. In addition, rules promulgated by the
state board of education shall set forth criteria for renewal of adminis-
trator certificates, which shall include a requirement that administrator
certificate holders must complete a course consisting of a minimum of three
(3) semester credits in the statewide framework for teachers' evaluations,
such. Such course shall include a laboratory component.
(2) If the holder of a certificate who has undergone a criminal history
check pursuant to district policy as provided in section 33-512(15), Idaho
Code, is found to have been convicted of any felony crime enumerated in sec-
tion 33-1208, Idaho Code, the certificate shall be revoked or suspended as
provided in this chapter.
(3) The state board of education may by rule require professional de-
velopment credits as a condition of certificate renewal, provided that such
rule must recognize providing instruction in a professional development
course or in a course at an institution of higher education as an option to
complete required credits.
(4) The state board of education may, subject to legislative approval,
establish rules to provide for the issuance of a lifetime instructional
certificate or a lifetime administrator certificate to any certificated
teacher or administrator who has accumulated at least twenty-five (25)
years of combined teaching and administration experience in an Idaho school
district, a public charter school in Idaho, or an equivalent public school
system in another jurisdiction. Experience in either teaching or adminis-
tration may be applied toward the total required years for either certifi-
cate. Such certificate shall:
(a) Be issued at no cost to the teacher or administrator;
(b) Not require any ongoing reporting, maintenance, or professional
development from the teacher or administrator; and
(c) Be valid for the duration of the teacher's or administrator's life-
time, provided that the teacher or administrator does not engage in any


professional misconduct that would warrant revocation pursuant to sec-
tion 33-1208, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.